Maryland, session 2025, HB0464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
8–405.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0464*

HOUSE BILL 464
(4) “Individualized education program” and “individualized family service
plan” have the same meaning as provided in the federal Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act.
(b) (1) When a team of qualified professionals and the parents meet for the
purpose of discussing the identification, evaluation, educational program, or the provision
of a free appropriate public education of a child with a disability:
(i) The parents of the child shall be afforded the opportunity to
participate and shall be provided reasonable notice in advance of the meeting; and
(ii) Reasonable notice shall be at least 10 calendar days in advance
of the meeting, unless an expedited meeting is being conducted to:
1. Address disciplinary issues;
2. Determine the placement of the child with a disability not
currently receiving educational services; or
3. Meet other urgent needs of a child with a disability to
ensure the provision of a free appropriate public education.
(2) (i) 1. At the initial evaluation meeting, the parents of the child
shall be provided:
A. In plain language, an oral and written explanation of the
parents’ rights and responsibilities in the individualized education program process and a
program procedural safeguards notice;
B. Written information that the parents may use to contact
early intervention and special education family support services staff members within the
local school system and a brief description of the services provided by the staff members;
C. Written information on the Special Education
Ombudsman and toll–free telephone number established under Title 6, Subtitle 5 of the
State Government Article;
D. Written information about the Access to Attorneys,
Advocates, and Consultants for Special Education Program established under § 8–413.1 of
this subtitle; [and]
E. Written informational materials regarding the Maryland
ABLE Program provided under § 18–19C–03(a)(2) of this article; AND
F. WRITTEN INFORMATION ABOUT TRANSITION
SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN § 21–305 OF THIS ARTICLE, TO ASSIST IN SECONDARY

HOUSE BILL 464 3
TRANSITION PLANNING FOR A CHILD WITH AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION
PROGRAM.
2. At least one time each year [at]:
A. AT an individualized education program or individualized
family service plan team meeting, the parents of the child shall be provided with the written
informational materials described under subsubparagraph 1E of this subparagraph; AND
B. BEGINNING THE YEAR THAT A CHILD WITH AN
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM TURNS 14 YEARS OLD, THE PARENTS OF
THE CHILD SHALL BE PROVIDED WITH THE WRITTEN MATERIALS DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1F OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH AT A TEAM MEETING.
3. If a parent’s native language is not English, the
information in subsubparagraph 1B, C, D, [and] E, AND F of this subparagraph shall be
provided to the parent in the parent’s native language.
(ii) The parents may request the information provided under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph at any subsequent meeting.
(iii) If a child who has an individualized education program
developed in another school system moves into a different local school system, that local
school system shall provide the information required under subparagraph (i)1B, C, D, [and]
E, AND F of this paragraph at the time of the first written communication with the parents
regarding the child’s individualized education program or special education services.
(iv) A local school system shall publish information that a parent
may use to contact early intervention and special education family support services staff
members within the local school system and a brief description of the services provided by
the staff members in a prominent place on the section of its website relating to special
education services.
(3) Failure to provide the information required under paragraph (2)(i)1B,
C, D, [and] E, AND F of this subsection does not constitute grounds for a due process
complaint under § 8–413 of this subtitle.
(j) The Department shall adopt:
(1) Regulations that define what information should be provided in the
verbal and written explanations of the parents’ rights and responsibilities in the
individualized education program process; and
(2) Any other regulations necessary to carry out subsection (b)(2) and (4) of
this section.

HOUSE BILL 464
21–305.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Transition services” means a coordinated set of activities for a student
with a disability who meets the definition of a transitioning student that promotes
movement from school to postschool activities, including postsecondary education,
vocational training, integrated employment, supported employment, adult services,
independent living, and community participation.
(4) “Transitioning student” means a student with a disability who is
between the ages of 14 and 21 years who meets the eligibility criteria of the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or § 7 of the federal Rehabilitation Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.